Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Tourist and Trailer Camps, Motor Courts, and Motels.

Collateral references. —

40 Am. Jur. 2d, Hotels, Motels, and Restaurants, §§ 4, 5, 13 — 19, 25 — 44.

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, § 408

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parks, Squares, and Playgrounds, § 30.

14 C.J.S., Civil Rights, § 7

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 3, 5 — 9, 21, 26, 27, 47, 59, 81.

43A C.J.S., Inns, Hotels, and Eating Places, §§ 1 — 11.

Sec. 18.35.010.
Purpose.

The purpose of AS

18.35.010

—

18.35.090

is to establish and maintain minimum standards of health and sanitation in tourist camps, trailer camps, motor courts, and motels necessary and desirable for the protection of the public health and welfare.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.35.020.
Administration of laws and regulations.

The department has jurisdiction over the health and sanitary conditions of tourist accommodations under AS

18.35.010

—

18.35.090

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 100 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.35.030.
Regulations.

The department may adopt and enforce regulations that relate to health and sanitation in the construction, operation, and maintenance of the accommodations including but not limited to minimum standards for water supply, sewage and refuse disposal, laundry, bathing and toilet facilities, communicable disease control, general cleanliness and safety, that are necessary or desirable for the protection of public health.

The provisions of AS

18.35.010

—

18.35.090

do not prohibit the health authorities of a municipality from instituting local programs for health and sanitary control of tourist accommodations, including the enactment of ordinances for issuance and revocation of permits and additional regulations. However, the ordinance or regulation may not detract from the provisions of AS

18.35.010

—

18.35.090

or the regulations under these sections.

History.

(§ 3 ch 100 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For public accommodations, see 18 AAC 30, art. 4.

Collateral references. —

Maintenance or regulation by public authorities of tourist or motor camps, courts, or motels.
22 ALR2d 774.

Validity of statutes, ordinances, and regulations requiring the installation or maintenance of various bathroom facilities in dwelling units. 79 ALR3d 716.

Secs. 18.35.040,
18.35.050.
Permits; penalty for noncompliance with permit requirement. [Repealed, § 2 ch 107 SLA 2006.]

Sec. 18.35.060.
Unlawful disposal of wastes.

A person may not dispose of human excreta, garbage, or refuse on or near a public way or thoroughfare or on or near a tourist accommodation except in the use of appropriate facilities.

History.

(§ 6 ch 100 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.35.070.
Posting laws and regulations. [Repealed, § 2 ch 107 SLA 2006.]

Sec. 18.35.080.
Penalty for noncompliance.

A person who fails to comply with AS

18.35.010

—

18.35.090

or the regulations adopted under those sections, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $100, or by imprisonment in a jail for not more than 30 days, or both.

History.

(§ 8 ch 100 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 2006)

Sec. 18.35.090.
Definitions.

In AS

18.35.010

—

18.35.090

,

“department” means the Department of Environmental Conservation;

“tourist accommodations” means a place maintained or held out to the public for purposes of abode, whether occupied by transient or permanent guests, whether equipped with tents, tent houses, cottages, automobile trailers, coaches, motor courts, or motels, and regardless of whether benefit accrues to the owner or operator.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1955; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am E.O. No. 51, § 35 (1981))

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms. In 2002, in paragraph (2), “and” was inserted before “regardless” to conform the language to the style of the Alaska Statutes.